tables/ur-pk-g1.utb
#                                                ASCII as in text ASCII in Braille     Notes
always \x0648\x0651 6-2456                       W,               ,W
always \x0641\x0651 6-124                        F,               ,F
always \x0642\x0651 6-12345                      Q,               ,Q
always \x0635\x0651 6-12346                      &,               ,&
always \x0646\x0651 6-1345                       N,               ,N
always \x0646\x0650\x0651 6-1345-15              NE,              ,NE
always \x0646\x0651\x062C 1345-6-245             N,J              N,J                  No change in this case
always \x0632\x0651 6-1356                       Z,               ,Z
always \x0631\x0651 6-1235                       R,               ,R
always \x0631\x0650\x0651 6-1235-15              RE,              ,RE
always \x0631\x064F\x0651 6-1235-136             RU,              ,RU
always \x06CC\x0651 6-24                         I,               ,I
always \x062C\x064F\x0651 6-245-136              JU,              ,JU
always \x06A9\x0651 6-13                         K,               ,K
always \x06A9\x06BE\x0651 6-13-236               K8,              ,K8
always \x062F\x0651 6-145                        D,               ,D
always \x0686\x0651 6-14                         C,               ,C
always \x0686\x06C1\x0651 6-14-125               CH,              ,CH
always \x0686\x06BE\x0651 6-14-236               C8,              ,C8
always \x062C\x0651 6-245                        J,               ,J
always \x0628\x0651 6-12                         B,               ,B
always \x0645\x0651 6-134                        M,               ,M
always \x062A\x0651 6-2345                       T,               ,T
always \x0644\x0651 6-123                        L,               ,L
always \x067E\x0651 6-1234                       P,               ,P
always \x0633\x0651 6-234                        S,               ,S
always \x0679\x0651 6-246                        [,               ,[
always \x0679\x06BE\x0651 6-246-236              [8,              ,[8
always \x0638\x0651 6-123456                     =,               ,=
always \x0688\x0651 6-346                        +,               ,+
always \x0634\x0651 6-146                        %,               ,%
always \x0637\x0651 6-23456                      ),               ,)
always \x0688\x0650\x0651 6-346-15               +E,              ,+E
always \x062A\x062A\x064E\x0651 6-2345-2345-2    TTE,             ,TTE
always \x062A\x0650\x0651 15-6-2345              TE,              E,T

#---end of table---#
